Hawaii statutes.
[§503B-2] Oath and seal. (a) Within
three months of appointment, a commissioner shall:

(1) Cause an official seal to be prepared, upon which
seal shall appear the commissioner's name and the words "commissioner of
deeds for Hawaii"; and

(2) Take and subscribe an oath to faithfully perform
the duties of the commissioner's office; provided that the oath shall be taken
before:

(A) A notary public in the State or any other
state;

(B) Any officer of the United States
diplomatic or consular service resident in any foreign country or port, when
certified by the officer under the officer's seal of office; or

(C) Any person authorized by the law of any
foreign country to take an acknowledgment or proof; provided that the
acknowledgment or proof shall be accompanied by a certificate to the effect
that the person taking the acknowledgment or proof is duly authorized to do so
and that the acknowledgment or proof is in a manner prescribed by the laws of
the foreign country or a treaty or international agreement of the United
States; provided further that a certificate under this subparagraph may be
issued by:

(i) A diplomatic or consular officer of the
United States under the seal of the officer's office;

(ii) A diplomatic or consular officer of the
foreign country under the seal of the officer's office with the signature or
facsimile of the signature of the diplomatic or consular officer of the United
States; or

(iii) An apostille in the case of a foreign
country that is party to the Hague Convention of 5 October 1961 Abolishing the
Requirement of Legalisation for Foreign Public Documents.

(b) A commissioner's oath of office, the
commissioner's signature, and an impression of the commissioner's seal shall be
transmitted to and filed with the office of the lieutenant governor.

(c) For purposes of this section, a diplomatic
or consular officer includes any minister, consul, vice consul, charge
d'affaires, consular or commercial agent, or a vice consular or vice commercial
agent. [L 2013, c 277, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next